Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 68 Exploitation of Elder Persons

11-68-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Business relationship” means a relationship between two (2) or more individuals or entities where there exists an oral or written contract or agreement for goods or services.

“Caregiver” means a person who has been entrusted with or has assumed responsibility for the care or the property of an elder person. Caregiver includes, but is not limited to, relatives, court-appointed or voluntary guardians, adult household members, neighbors, healthcare providers, and employees and volunteers of elder care facilities.

“Deception” means misrepresenting or concealing a material fact relating to:

Services rendered, disposition of property, or use of property, when such services or property are intended to benefit an elder person; or

Terms of a contract or agreement entered into with an elder person; or

An existing or preexisting condition of any property involved in a contract or agreement entered into with an elder person; or

Using any misrepresentation, false pretense, or false promise in order to induce, encourage, or solicit an elder person to enter into a contract or agreement.

“Elder person” means a person sixty (60) years of age or older.

“Intimidation” means the communication by word or act to an elder person that the elder person will be deprived of food, nutrition, clothing, shelter, supervision, medicine, medical services, money, or financial support or will suffer physical violence.

“Lacks capacity to consent” means an impairment by reason of mental illness, developmental disability, organic brain disorder, physical illness or disability, short-term memory loss, or other cause, that causes an elder person to lack sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate reasonable decisions concerning the elder person’s person or property.

“Position of trust and confidence” with respect to an elder person means the position of a person who:

Is a spouse, adult child, or other relative by blood or marriage of the elder person;

Is a joint tenant or tenant in common with the elder person;

Has a legal or fiduciary relationship with the elder person including, but not limited to, a court-appointed or voluntary guardian, trustee, attorney, or conservator;

Is the caregiver of the elder person; or

Is any other person who has been entrusted with or has assumed responsibility for the use or management of the elder person’s funds, assets, or property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 204, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 77, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 78, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.

11-68-2.
Exploitation of an elder person.

A person is guilty of exploitation of an elder person if that person:

Knowingly, by deception or intimidation, obtains or uses, or endeavors to obtain or use, an elder person’s funds, assets or property with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the elder person of the use, benefit, or possession of the funds, assets or property, or to benefit someone other than the elder person by a person who:

Stands in a position of trust and confidence with the elder person; or

Has a business relationship with the elder person; or

Knowingly, by deception or intimidation, obtains or uses, endeavors to obtain or use, or conspires with another to obtain or use an elder person’s funds, assets, or property with the intent to temporarily or permanently deprive the elder person of the use, benefit, or possession of the funds, assets, or property, or to benefit someone other than the elder person, by a person who knows or reasonably should know that the elder person lacks the capacity to consent.

Any person who shall exploit an elder person as defined in this chapter shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 204, § 2.

11-68-3.
Penalties for violations.

Any person convicted of exploiting an elder person as provided under this chapter shall be punished as follows:

If the funds, assets, or property involved in the exploitation of the elder person are valued at less than five hundred dollars ($500), the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or both.

If the funds, assets, or property involved in the exploitation of the elder person are valued at five hundred dollars ($500) or more, but less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or both.

If the funds, assets, or property involved in the exploitation of the elder person are valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) years or by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 161, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 204, § 2.